Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-771
Herd plan; contents; prohibited acts;
penalty.

The
herd owner or custodian, in cooperation with the department, shall develop
a herd plan which may include (a) the vaccination, treatment, and testing
of an infected herd, (b) cleaning and disinfection of premises of an infected
herd, and (c) carcass disposal. A herd owner or custodian of an infected herd
who fails to develop a herd plan or who fails to follow the herd plan is guilty
of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 2009, LB99, § 8.